Tennessee, session 114, HB2371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316(e)(2), is amended by
deleting "By February 1 of each year" and substituting "By February 15 of each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2371
012740
- 1 -